Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-574
Vacancies.

Unless otherwise provided by law, all vacancies shall be filled within forty-five days after the vacancy occurs unless good cause is shown that the requirement imposes an undue burden.

Laws 2015, LB575, § 13.